West Virginia, session 2025, HB2780.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-131. Subsidized child care for employees of child care programs. A child care program employee who works a minimum of 20 hours per week, is eligible for a child care program subsidy, as determined by the department, regardless of household income.